Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE I. ENFORCEMENT OF TRAFFIC LAWS

CHAPTER 705. ALLOWING DANGEROUS DRIVER TO BORROW MOTOR VEHICLE

Sec. 705.001. ALLOWING DANGEROUS DRIVER TO BORROW MOTOR VEHICLE; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) knowingly permits another to operate a motor vehicle owned by the person; and

(2) knows that at the time permission is given the other person's license has been suspended as a result of a:

(A) conviction of an offense under:

(i) Section 49.04, Penal Code;

(ii) Section 49.07, Penal Code, if the offense involved operation of a motor vehicle; or

(iii) Article 6701l-1, Revised Statutes, as that law existed before September 1, 1994; or

(B) failure to give a specimen under:

(i) Chapter 724; or

(ii) Chapter 434, Acts of the 61st Legislature, Regular Session, 1969 (Article 6701l-5, Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes), as that law existed before September 1, 1995.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.